Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PORTABLE COOLING DEVICES
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 90.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Extreme heat event” means a day on which National  Weather Service of the Na-
tional Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration has predicted or indicated that there  exists
a heat index of extreme caution for the county.
(b) “Portable cooling device” includes air conditioners and  evaporative coolers, including
devices mounted in a window or that are designed to sit on the floor  but not including de-
vices whose installation or use requires alteration to the dwelling unit.
(2) A landlord may  not prohibit or restrict a tenant from installing or using a portable
cooling device of the tenant’s choosing, unless:
(a) The installation or use of the device would:
(A) Violate building codes or state or federal law;
(B) Violate the device manufacture’s written safety guidelines for the device;
(C) Damage the premises or render the premises uninhabitable; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 1
(D) Require amperage to power the  device that cannot be accommodated by the power
service to the building, dwelling unit or circuit;
(b) If the device would be installed in a window:
(A) The window is a necessary egress from the dwelling unit;
(B) The device would interfere with the tenant’s ability  to lock a window that is acces-
sible from outside;
(C) The device requires the use of brackets or other hardware that  would damage or void
the warranty of the window or frame, puncture the envelope  of the building or otherwise
cause significant damages;
(D) The restrictions require that the device be  adequately drained to prevent damage to
the dwelling unit or building; or
(E) The restrictions require that the device be installed in a manner  that prevents risk
of falling; or
(c) The restrictions require that the device be:
(A) Installed or removed by the landlord or landlord’s agent;
(B) Subject to inspection or servicing by the landlord or landlord’s agent; or
(C) Removed from October 1 through April 30.
(3) A landlord may not enforce a restriction on portable cooling devices  against a tenant
allowed under subsection (2) of this section unless the restrictions are in writing and  deliv-
ered to the tenant. The written restrictions must include whether the landlord intends  to
operate, whenever there is an extreme  heat event for the county of the premises, one or
more community cooling spaces available  to the tenant that are located on or near the
premises and that maintain a temperature of not higher than 80 degrees Fahrenheit.
(4) A landlord is immune from liability for any claim for damages, injury or death caused
by a portable cooling device installed by the tenant.
(5) A landlord who  must limit portable cooling devices for a building under subsection
(2)(a)(D) of this section shall prioritize allowing  the use of devices for individuals who require
a device to accommodate a disability. A landlord is not  responsible for any interruption in
electrical service that is not caused by the  landlord, including interruptions caused by an
electrical supply’s inability to accommodate use of a portable cooling device.
(6) If a landlord issues  a termination notice under ORS 90.392 or 90.630 based on a vio-
lation of a restriction regulating a portable cooling device allowed under subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) On  each day that there is an extreme heat event for the county of the premises, the
notice period described in ORS 90.392 (3), (4), (5) or (6) or 90.630 (1), (3) or (6) does not run.
(b) The termination notice must state:
(A) The deadline of a cure period designated in the notice, if any;
(B) That the date of termination specified in the notice will  be extended by one day for
each day that there is an extreme heat event for the county of the premises; and
(C) That information regarding days with an extreme heat event can  be found on the
website for the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 94.779 is amended to read:
94.779. (1) A  provision of a planned community’s governing document or landscaping or archi-
tectural guidelines that imposes irrigation requirements on an owner or the association is void and
unenforceable while any of the following is in effect:
(a) A declaration by the Governor that a severe, continuing drought exists or  is likely to occur
in a political subdivision within which the planned community is located;
(b) A finding  by the Water Resources Commission that a severe, continuing drought exists or
is likely to occur in a political subdivision within which the planned community is located;
(c) An ordinance adopted by the governing body of  a political subdivision within which the
planned community is located that requires conservation or curtailment of water use; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 2
(d) A rule adopted by the association under  subsection (2) of this section to reduce or eliminate
irrigation water use.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision  of a planned community’s governing documents or landscap-
ing or architectural guidelines imposing irrigation requirements on an owner or the association, an
association may adopt rules that:
(a) Require the reduction or elimination of irrigation on any portion of the planned  community.
(b) Permit or require  the replacement of turf or other landscape vegetation with xeriscape on
any portion of the planned community.
(c) Require prior review and approval by the association or its  designee of any plans by an
owner or the association to replace turf or other landscape vegetation with xeriscape.
(d) Require the use of  best practices and industry standards to reduce the landscaped areas and
minimize irrigation of  existing landscaped areas of common property where turf is necessary for the
function of the landscaped area.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this  section, if adopted on or after January
1, 2018,  the following provisions of a planned community’s governing document are void and
unenforceable:
(a) A provision that prohibits or restricts the use of the owner’s unit or  lot as the premises of
an exempt family child care provider participating in the subsidy program under ORS 329A.500; or
(b) If the unit does not share a wall, floor or ceiling surface in common  with another unit, a
provision that prohibits or restricts the use of the owner’s unit or lot as a  certified or registered
family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not prohibit a  homeowners association from adopting or
enforcing a provision of the  planned community’s governing document that regulates parking, noise,
odors, nuisance, use of common property or activities that impact the  cost of insurance policies held
by the planned community, provided the provision:
(a) Is reasonable; and
(b) Does not  have the effect of prohibiting or restricting the use of a unit or lot as the premises
of an exempt family child care provider participating in the  subsidy program under ORS 329A.500
or as a certified or registered family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(5)(a) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to planned communities  that provide housing
for older persons.
(b) As used in this  subsection, “housing for older persons” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 659A.421.
(6) A provision in a planned community’s governing document that  restricts or prohibits
the installation or use of a portable cooling device, as defined in section 2 (1) of  this 2022
Act, is void and unenforceable, unless:
(a) The installation or use of the device would:
(A) Violate building codes or state or federal law; or
(B) Violate the device manufacture’s written safety guidelines for the device; or
(b) The restrictions are only to require that the device  be removed from October 1
through April 30.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 100.023 is amended to read:
100.023. (1) A provision of a condominium’s  governing document or landscaping or architectural
guidelines that imposes irrigation requirements on  a unit owner or the association is void and
unenforceable while any of the following is in effect:
(a) A declaration by the Governor that a severe, continuing drought exists or  is likely to occur
in a political subdivision within which the condominium is located;
(b) A finding by the Water Resources Commission that a severe, continuing drought  exists or
is likely to occur in a political subdivision within which the condominium is located;
(c) An ordinance adopted by the governing  body of a political subdivision within which the
condominium is located that requires conservation or curtailment of water use; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 3
(d) A rule adopted by the association under  subsection (2) of this section to reduce or eliminate
irrigation water use.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of a condominium’s governing  document or landscaping or
architectural guidelines imposing irrigation requirements on a unit owner or the association,  an
association may adopt rules that:
(a) Require the reduction or elimination of irrigation on any portion of the condominium.
(b) Permit or require the replacement of turf or other landscape vegetation  with xeriscape on
any portion of the condominium.
(c) Require prior review and approval by the association or its designee of  any plans by a unit
owner or the association to replace turf or other landscape vegetation with xeriscape.
(d) Require the use of  best practices and industry standards to reduce the landscaped areas and
minimize irrigation of existing landscaped general common elements where  turf is necessary for the
function of the general common elements.
(3) Except as provided  in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, if adopted after January 1,
2018, the following provisions of a condominium’s governing document are void and unenforceable:
(a) A provision that prohibits or restricts the use of  the unit owner’s condominium unit or any
limited common element  designated for exclusive use by the occupants of the unit as the premises
of an exempt family child care provider participating in the subsidy program under ORS  329A.500;
or
(b) If the condominium unit does not share a wall, floor or ceiling surface in  common with an-
other unit, a provision that prohibits or restricts the use of the unit  owner’s condominium unit or
any limited common  element designated for exclusive use by the occupants of the unit as a certified
or registered family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not prohibit an association  of unit owners from adopting
or enforcing a provision of the condominium’s governing  document that regulates parking, noise,
odors, nuisance, use of common elements or activities  that impact the cost of insurance policies held
by the condominium, provided the provision:
(a) Is reasonable; and
(b) Does not have the effect of prohibiting or restricting the  use of a unit as the premises of an
exempt family child care provider participating in the subsidy program  under ORS 329A.500 or as
a certified or registered family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(5)(a) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to condominiums that  provide housing for
older persons.
(b) As used in this subsection, “housing for older persons” has the meaning  given that term in
ORS 659A.421.
(6) A provision in  a condominium’s governing document that restricts or prohibits the
installation or use of a portable cooling device, as defined in section 2 (1) of this 2022 Act,
is void and unenforceable, unless:
(a) The installation or use of the device would:
(A) Violate building codes or state or federal law;
(B) Violate the device manufacture’s written safety guidelines for the device;
(C) Interfere with the common elements of the condominium; or
(D) Require amperage to power the device that cannot  be accommodated by the power
service to the building, unit or circuit;
(b) The device would be installed in a window and:
(A) The window is a necessary egress from the unit;
(B) The device would  interfere with the unit owner’s ability to lock a window that is ac-
cessible from outside;
(C) Requires the use of brackets or other hardware  that would damage or void the war-
ranty of the window or frame, puncture the envelope of the building or otherwise cause sig-
nificant damages;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 4
(D) The restrictions require that the device be  adequately drained to prevent damage to
the dwelling unit or building; or
(E) The restrictions require  that the device be installed in a manner that prevents risk
of falling; or
(c) The restrictions are only to require that the device be:
(A) Installed by building maintenance or a licensed contractor; or
(B) Removed from October 1 through April 30.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 197.772 is amended to read:
197.772. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a local  government shall allow a prop-
erty owner to refuse to consent to any form of historic property designation at any point during the
designation process. Such refusal to consent shall remove  the property from any form of consider-
ation for historic property designation under ORS 358.480  to 358.545 or other law, except for con-
sideration or nomination to the National  Register of Historic Places pursuant to the National
Historic Preservation Act of 1966, as amended (54 U.S.C. 300101 et seq.).
(2) A permit for the demolition or  modification of property removed from consideration for his-
toric property designation under subsection (1) of this section may not  be issued during the 120-day
period following the date of the property owner’s refusal to consent.
(3) A local government shall  allow a property owner to remove from the property a historic
property designation that was imposed on the property by the local government.
(4) A local government may not enforce  any ordinance or design regulation restricting
the use of a portable cooling device, as  defined in section 2 (1) of this 2022 Act, based on a
historic property designation for property used as a residential tenancy, unless:
(a) The restriction is necessary to protect  or prohibit the removal of historical archi-
tectural features of the property; or
(b) The restriction only requires that the device  be removed from October 1 through
April 30.
SECTION 6.
(1) Section 2 of this 2022 Act applies to tenancies commenced before, on or
after the effective date of this 2022 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 94.779 by section 3 of this 2022  Act apply to provisions in
governing documents adopted before, on or after the effective date of this 2022 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 100.023  by section 4 of this 2022 Act apply to provisions in
a condominium’s governing document adopted before, on or after the effective date of this
2022 Act.
(4) The amendments to ORS 197.772 by section  5 of this 2022 Act apply to ordinances and
design regulations adopted by a local government before, on or after the effective date of this
2022 Act.
AIR CONDITIONER AND AIR FILTER
DEPLOYMENT PROGRAM
SECTION 7.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Air conditioner” means a portable, stand-up air conditioner that has an  energy effi-
ciency ratio rating of eight or higher.
(b)(A) “Air filter”  means an air filtering device that uses a high-efficiency particulate air
(HEPA) filter to remove contaminating particles from the air.
(B) “Air filter” does not include a device that is  labeled an “air purifier” and that uses
an electrostatic or ionizing process.
(c) “Eligible distribution entity” means a:
(A) Local government as defined in ORS 174.116;
(B) Local housing authority;
(C) Nonprofit organization;
(D) Federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 5
(E) Indian health center;
(F) Coordinated care organization as defined in ORS 414.025;
(G) Community action agency as described in ORS 458.505;
(H) Manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative as defined in ORS 62.803;
(I) Landlord that has a residential tenant who has received medical assistance  through
the Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human Services or Medicare within the
past 12 months;
(J) Electric utility as defined in ORS 757.600; or
(K) Natural gas utility as defined in ORS 757.392.
(d) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall create a program to:
(A) Acquire a supply of air conditioners and air filters; and
(B) Distribute the air conditioners and air  filters to eligible distribution entities that will
provide the air  conditioners and air filters on an emergency basis to eligible individuals as
described in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) The Oregon  Health Authority may provide or contract with one or more third parties
to administer the program.
(3) The administrator of the program shall:
(a) Determine the percentage of program funds  needed to support the costs of installa-
tion and materials for installation.
(b) Determine the  percentage of program funds, but no more than 10 percent of program
funds, needed to  cover the costs of the authority or a third party or parties and eligible
distribution entities in administering the program.
(c) Make technical assistance resources available to  individuals who receive an air con-
ditioner or air filter under the program  that answer questions about the installation, use and
maintenance of the air conditioners and air filters.
(d) Provide technical assistance to eligible distribution entities, including  assistance that
supports the distribution, installation and maintenance of the  air conditioners and air filters.
(4) An  eligible distribution entity may distribute air conditioners and air filters under this
section only to individuals who:
(a) Are eligible to receive  medical assistance through the Oregon Health Authority, the
Department of Human Services or Medicare, or have received any of  these services in the
past 12 months;
(b) Reside in any type  of housing or recreational vehicle, as defined in ORS 174.101, that
has electricity for operating the air conditioner or air filter; and
(c) Upon receiving an air conditioner or air filter, provide an  attestation that the indi-
vidual can safely and legally install the air conditioner or air filter in the individual’s home
or recreational vehicle.
(5) The Oregon Health Authority shall make available a list  of eligible distribution enti-
ties participating in the program to:
(a) Individuals who are eligible  to receive medical assistance through the Oregon Health
Authority or Department of Human Services.
(b) The 2-1-1 system provided for in ORS 403.400 to 403.430.
(c) The Housing and Community Services Department.
(6) The Oregon  Health Authority and any eligible distribution entity participating in the
program are immune from civil liability for:
(a) The functioning, safety or impact  of any air conditioner or air filter distributed by the
program.
(b) Any heat-related health impacts to an individual using an air  conditioner or air filter
distributed by the program.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to implement the program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 6
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for  the program created under section 7 of this 2022
Act.
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY SERVICES DEPARTMENT WEBSITE
SECTION 9. Section 10 of this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 458.
SECTION 10. The Housing and  Community Services Department shall make available on
the department’s website:
(1) A list  of dates and counties in which there exists an extreme heat event as defined
in section 2 of this 2022 Act. Dates published on the website  must remain on the website for
at least one year.
(2) Information  regarding relevant programs and services available to landlords to pro-
vide adequate cooling under ORS 90.320 (1)(m) or 90.730 (3)(d), including:
(a) Programs administered by the department;
(b) Information  provided by the Oregon Health Authority regarding programs adminis-
tered by the authority, including the list  of eligible distribution entities compiled under sec-
tion 7 (5) of this 2022 Act;
(c) Information provided by the State Department of Energy regarding programs  admin-
istered by the department;
(d) Programs administered by the nongovernmental  entity that administers public pur-
pose charge moneys under ORS 757.612 (3)(d); and
(e) Federal programs, rebates or incentives, including those administered  by the
Bonneville Power Administration.
COOLING REQUIREMENTS IN NEW UNITS
SECTION 11.
 ORS 90.320 is amended to read:
90.320. (1) A landlord shall at all times  during the tenancy maintain the dwelling unit in a
habitable condition. For purposes of this section, a dwelling  unit shall be considered unhabitable if
it substantially lacks:
(a) Effective waterproofing and weather protection of  roof and exterior walls, including windows
and doors;
(b) Plumbing facilities that conform to applicable  law in effect at the time of installation[ ,] and
are maintained in good working order;
(c) A water supply approved under applicable law that is:
(A) Under the  control of the tenant or landlord and is capable of producing hot and cold running
water;
(B) Furnished to appropriate fixtures;
(C) Connected to a sewage disposal system approved under applicable law; and
(D) Maintained so as to  provide safe drinking water and to be in good working order to the
extent that the system can be controlled by the landlord;
(d) Adequate heating facilities that conform to applicable law at the time  of installation and are
maintained in good working order;
(e) Electrical lighting with wiring and electrical  equipment that conform to applicable law at
the time of installation and is maintained in good working order;
(f) Buildings, grounds and appurtenances at the time  of the commencement of the rental agree-
ment in every part safe for normal and reasonably foreseeable uses, clean,  sanitary and free from
all accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, rodents and vermin, and all areas under control
of the landlord kept in every part safe for normal and reasonably foreseeable uses, clean, sanitary
and free from all accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, rodents and vermin;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 7
(g) Except as otherwise provided  by local ordinance or by written agreement between the
landlord and the tenant, an adequate number of appropriate receptacles for garbage and  rubbish in
clean condition and good  repair at the time of the commencement of the rental agreement, and the
landlord shall provide and maintain appropriate serviceable receptacles thereafter  and arrange for
their removal;
(h) Floors, walls, ceilings, stairways and railings maintained in good repair;
(i) Ventilating,  air conditioning and other facilities and appliances, including elevators, main-
tained in good repair if supplied or required to be supplied by the landlord;
(j) Safety from fire hazards, including  a working smoke alarm or smoke detector, with working
batteries if solely battery-operated, provided only at the beginning of any new tenancy when the
tenant first takes possession of the premises, as provided in ORS 479.270, but not to include  the
tenant’s testing of the smoke alarm or smoke detector as provided in ORS 90.325 (1);
(k) A carbon monoxide alarm, and the dwelling unit:
(A) Contains a carbon monoxide source; or
(B) Is  located within a structure that contains a carbon monoxide source and the dwelling unit
is connected to the room in  which the carbon monoxide source is located by a door, ductwork or
a ventilation shaft; [ or]
(L) Working locks for all dwelling entrance doors, and,  unless contrary to applicable law,
latches for all windows,  by which access may be had to that portion of the premises that the tenant
is entitled under the rental  agreement to occupy to the exclusion of others and keys for those locks
that require keys[ .]; or
(m) For a dwelling unit in a building where building permits for its  construction were
issued on or after April 1, 2024, adequate cooling facilities that:
(A) Provide cooling in at least one room of the dwelling unit, not including a bathroom;
(B) Conform to applicable law at the time of installation and are maintained  in good
working order; and
(C) May include central air conditioning, an air-source or ground-source heat pump  or a
portable air conditioning device that is provided by the landlord.
(2) The landlord and tenant may agree in writing that the tenant is to perform specified  repairs,
maintenance tasks and minor remodeling only if:
(a) The agreement of the parties is entered into in good faith and not for  the purpose of evading
the obligations of the landlord;
(b) The agreement does  not diminish the obligations of the landlord to other tenants in the
premises; and
(c) The terms and conditions of the  agreement are clearly and fairly disclosed and adequate
consideration for the agreement is specifically stated.
(3) Any provisions of this section  that reasonably apply only to a structure that is used as a
home, residence or sleeping place [ shall] do not apply to a manufactured dwelling, recreational ve-
hicle or floating home where the tenant owns the manufactured dwelling, recreational  vehicle or
floating home, rents the space and, in the case of a dwelling or home, the  space is not in a facility.
Manufactured dwelling or floating home tenancies in which the tenant owns the dwelling  or home
and rents space in a facility [ shall be ] are governed by ORS 90.730[ ,] and not by this section.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 90.730 is amended to read:
90.730. (1) As used in  this section, “facility common areas” means all areas under control of the
landlord and held out for the general use of tenants.
(2) A landlord who rents a space for a manufactured dwelling or floating home shall  at all times
during the tenancy maintain the rented space,  vacant spaces in the facility and the facility common
areas in a habitable condition. The landlord does not have a duty to maintain  a dwelling or home.
A landlord’s habitability duty under this section includes only  the matters described in subsections
(3) to (6) of this section.
(3) For purposes of this section, a rented space  is considered unhabitable if it substantially
lacks:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 8
(a) A sewage disposal system and a connection to the  space approved under applicable law at
the time of installation and maintained in good  working order to the extent that the sewage disposal
system can be controlled by the landlord;
(b) If required by applicable law, a drainage system reasonably capable  of disposing of storm
water, ground water and subsurface water, approved under applicable law at  the time of installation
and maintained in good working order;
(c) A water supply and a connection to the space approved under applicable law at the  time of
installation and maintained so as to provide safe drinking water and to  be in good working order
to the extent that the water supply system can be controlled by the landlord;
(d) An  electrical supply and a connection to the space approved under applicable law at the time
of installation and maintained in good working order and of sufficient amperage to meet rea-
sonable year-round needs for electrical heating and cooling uses,  to the extent that the  elec-
trical supply system can be controlled by the landlord;
(e) A natural gas or propane gas supply and a connection to the space approved under applica-
ble law at the time of installation and maintained in good working order to the extent that  the gas
supply system can be controlled by the landlord, if the utility  service is provided within the facility
pursuant to the rental agreement;
(f) At the time of commencement of  the rental agreement, buildings, grounds and appurtenances
that are kept in every part safe for normal and reasonably foreseeable uses, clean,  sanitary and free
from all accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, rodents and vermin;
(g) Excluding the normal settling  of land, a surface or ground capable of supporting a manu-
factured dwelling approved under applicable law at the time of installation and maintained to sup-
port a dwelling in a safe manner so that it is suitable for occupancy. A landlord’s duty to  maintain
the surface or ground arises when the landlord knows or should know of a  condition regarding the
surface or ground that makes the dwelling unsafe to occupy; and
(h) Completion of any landlord-provided space improvements, including but not limited to  in-
stallation of carports, garages, driveways and sidewalks, approved under applicable law at the time
of installation.
(4) A rented space is considered unhabitable if the landlord does not maintain a hazard  tree as
required by ORS 90.727.
(5) A vacant space in a facility is considered unhabitable if the space substantially  lacks safety
from the hazards of fire or injury.
(6) A facility common area is considered unhabitable if it substantially lacks:
(a) Buildings, grounds and appurtenances that are kept in  every part safe for normal and rea-
sonably foreseeable uses,  clean, sanitary and free from all accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish,
garbage, rodents and vermin;
(b) Safety from the hazards of fire;
(c) Trees, shrubbery and grass maintained in a safe manner;
(d) If supplied or required to be  supplied by the landlord to a common area, a water supply
system, sewage disposal system or system for disposing  of storm water, ground water and subsurface
water approved under applicable law at the time of installation and maintained  in good working
order to the extent that the system can be controlled by the landlord; and
(e) Except as otherwise provided by local ordinance or by written agreement between the land-
lord and the tenant, an  adequate number of appropriate receptacles for garbage and rubbish in clean
condition and good repair at the time of  commencement of the rental agreement and for which the
landlord shall provide and maintain appropriate serviceable receptacles thereafter  and arrange for
their removal.
(7) The landlord and tenant may agree in writing that the tenant is to perform specified  repairs,
maintenance tasks and minor remodeling only if:
(a) The agreement of the parties is entered into in good faith and not for  the purpose of evading
the obligations of the landlord;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 9
(b) The agreement does not diminish the obligations of the landlord to  other tenants on the
premises; and
(c) The terms and conditions of the agreement are  clearly and fairly disclosed and adequate
consideration for the agreement is specifically stated.
SECTION 13. The amendments to ORS 90.730 by section 12 of this 2022 Act  apply only to
spaces in which, on or after the effective date of this 2022 Act:
(1) A new manufactured dwelling or floating home is connected to the electrical supply;
or
(2) The electrical supply or electrical supply connection is replaced.
HEAT PUMP DEPLOYMENT PROGRAM
SECTION 14. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Bulk fuel” means liquid petroleum, propane, coal, wood, wood-based  products or
other fuel delivered and stored until used on-site by the final consumer to produce energy.
(b) “Climate zone” means a  heating or cooling climate zone assigned to a county by the
Bonneville Power Administration.
(c) “Electric resistance heat” means heat produced by  passing an electric current
through a material that has high resistance, such as used in  an electric baseboard, wall or
space heater.
(d) “Electric utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(e) “Eligible entity” means a:
(A) Local government as defined in ORS 174.116;
(B) Local housing authority;
(C) Nonprofit organization;
(D) Federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon;
(E) Coordinated care organization as defined in ORS 414.025;
(F) Community action agency as described in ORS 458.505;
(G) Manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative as defined in ORS 62.803; or
(H) An electric utility.
(f) “Energy burden” means the percentage of gross household income spent on  energy
costs.
(g) “Environmental justice communities”  has the meaning given that term in ORS
469A.400.
(h) “Heat pump” means an air-source or ground-source heat pump  with an energy effi-
ciency rating set by the State Department of Energy  under subsection (5) of this section or
a higher efficiency rating.
(i) “Region” means an economic development district in Oregon, designated by the Eco-
nomic Development Administration  of the United States Department of Commerce, for which
a regional solutions center has been established under ORS 284.754.
(2) The  Heat Pump Deployment Program is established within the State Department of
Energy. The purpose of the program  is to award grants to one eligible entity for each region
and federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon  to provide financial assistance, including
loans, grants, rebates or incentives, for the purchase and  installation of heat pumps and
related upgrades to individuals who reside within that region or  who are members of that
tribe.
(3)(a) To be eligible to receive a grant from the  Heat Pump Deployment Program, an el-
igible entity must establish that it:
(A) Serves or represents:
(i) An environmental justice community or communities within a region; or
(ii) Members of a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon; and
(B) Has the capacity to administer grant funds received under this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 10
(b) An eligible entity applying for a grant may partner with  other eligible entities, but
the entity that is awarded the grant shall take  a lead role in administering grant funds and
providing financial assistance.
(c) An eligible  entity that serves or represents a community that is located within more
than one region may apply for a grant only for the region within which the  greatest per-
centage of the individuals of that community reside.
(d) An eligible entity that serves a specific  geographical area may propose, in consulta-
tion with any  electric utility that serves the area, that the department use alternative
boundaries to define a region. The  department may approve the use of alternative boundaries
to define a  region provided that a minimum percentage, as determined by the department,
of the eligible entity’s specific geographical area is within the alternative  boundaries of the
region.
(e) If an electric utility is awarded a grant from the Heat Pump Deployment Program:
(A) The electric utility may provide financial assistance from  grant funds only to indi-
viduals who reside within the electric utility’s service area and within the  region for which
the electric utility is awarded a grant.
(B) The electric utility shall partner with one or more other  eligible entities to provide
financial assistance from grant funds to individuals who  reside outside the electric utility’s
service area and within the region for which the electric utility is awarded a grant.
(4) An eligible entity that is awarded a  grant from the Heat Pump Deployment Program
shall:
(a) Use the grant funds to cover up to:
(A) One hundred percent of the purchase and installation costs of a heat pump.
(B) A percentage, as determined by the  department, of the costs for related upgrades
that support or enable the use of a heat pump, including:
(i) A new electrical panel or other  upgrades to the electrical system of a home or build-
ing.
(ii) Weatherization or other  structural repairs to reduce home or building heat and
cooling loss.
(iii) Upgrades to improve the airflow of a home or building.
(b) Prioritize the provision of financial assistance to:
(A) Environmental justice communities.
(B) Individuals who rely on bulk fuels or electric resistance heating.
(C) Individuals who reside in  a home or structure that does not have a functioning
heating or cooling system.
(c) Enter into a performance agreement with  the department as described in subsection
(8) of this section.
(5) The department shall:
(a) Award grants using available funds in the Heat Pump Deployment Fund established
under section 16 of this 2022 Act.
(b) In awarding grants, give preference to eligible entities with:
(A) Experience in administering state grant programs or programs similar  to the Heat
Pump Deployment Program.
(B) Experience with community  program development within a region or with members
of a tribe.
(C) Connections to communities within a region or with members of a tribe.
(c) Develop criteria for allocating the amount of each  grant based on the energy burden
of residences within the  region or of members of the tribe and the climate zones that make
up the counties of that region or of tribal lands.
(d) Permit a review of awarded grant funds by members of communities who  may benefit
from the Heat Pump Deployment Program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 11
(e) In consultation with electric  utilities, the Bonneville Power Administration and the
nongovernmental entity that  administers public purpose charge moneys collected under ORS
757.612 (3)(d), set the minimum energy efficiency rating that a heat pump must  have to be
eligible for grant funds. The minimum energy efficiency rating for a heat pump set  by the
department must be equal  to or greater than federal energy efficiency rating standards for
heat pumps.
(6) The department may  not use moneys collected through the energy resource supplier
assessment required under ORS 469.421 (8) to fund grants awarded under the Heat Pump
Deployment Program.
(7) The department may:
(a) Establish a maximum  amount of grant funds payable toward the purchase and in-
stallation of a heat pump and related upgrades.
(b) Permit the use of loans, grants, rebates or incentives offered by an electric  utility
or other programs toward any costs of the  purchase and installation of a heat pump and
related upgrades not covered by the Heat Pump Deployment Program.
(c) Provide information to individuals receiving financial assistance from the Heat  Pump
Deployment Program about other loans, grants, rebates or incentives that may be  offered
by an electric utility or other programs.
(d) Develop criteria for how specific loans, grants, rebates  or incentives offered by an
electric utility or other  programs may be used toward the costs of the purchase or installa-
tion of a heat pump and related upgrades.
(e) Establish incentives to encourage the purchase and installation  of heat pumps and
related upgrades that have higher efficiency ratings.
(f) Establish incentives for  the purchase and installation of a heating or cooling device
that has an efficiency rating similar to or higher than that of a heat pump and that provides
additional benefits such as improving indoor air quality or lowering an  individual’s energy
burden.
(g) Develop program procedures and practices that  align with the reporting and other
requirements of loans, grants, rebates or incentives offered by an electric utility or other
programs.
(h) Require, by rule, that eligible entities notify electric utilities of  a heat pump instal-
lation and whether grant funds may be used for necessary electric distribution system  up-
grades associated with the installation of the heat pump.
(8) Before receiving a  grant under this section, an eligible entity shall enter into a per-
formance agreement with the department that:
(a) Indicates the purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(b) Prohibits the eligible entity from using more than 15 percent of awarded grant  funds
for administrative expenses and marketing costs;
(c) Includes the repayment provisions set forth in subsection (9) of this section;
(d) Permits the department to  conduct audits and investigations of the eligible entity
regarding the use of grant funds; and
(e) Requires the eligible entity to provide reports as required by subsection (10) of this
section.
(9) An eligible entity must  repay to the department, in whole or in part, grant funds re-
ceived under this section to the extent that:
(a) The eligible entity does not use the grant  funds in accordance with the provisions of
the performance agreement executed between the department and the  eligible entity under
subsection (8) of this section; or
(b) The  Director of the State Department of Energy determines that the eligible entity
must repay all or part of the grant funds on grounds of  misappropriation, fraud or similar
reasons after auditing or investigating the eligible entity’s operations and conducting  a con-
tested case hearing under ORS 183.413 to 183.470.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 12
(10) Each eligible entity that receives a grant  under this section shall report to the de-
partment by June 30 of each year concerning  the status and use of grant funds. The report
may not disclose the personal information of the recipients  of financial assistance under the
program. The report must include:
(a) A detailed description of the eligible entity’s use of grant funds;
(b) A list of each loan, grant or other  financial assistance that the eligible entity has
provided and, where applicable, a full accounting of the repayment status of the loans;
(c) The nature and amounts of the administrative expenses and  marketing costs the eli-
gible entity has incurred in providing loans,  grants and other financial assistance under the
program; and
(d) Any other information required by the department.
(11) The department shall adopt rules to  carry out the provisions of this section. The
rules shall be developed in consultation with:
(a) The Bureau of Labor and Industries on issues related to the workforce.
(b) The Building Codes Division of  the Department of Consumer and Business Services
on issues related to building codes and commissioning.
(c) The Housing and Community Services  Department to ensure the Heat Pump Deploy-
ment Program complements any existing programs or services.
(d) The Department of  Environmental Quality on issues of air quality related to bulk
fuels and to  ensure the Heat Pump Deployment Program complements any existing programs
or services.
(e) The Oregon Health Authority on  any health impacts and health impact data related
to the Heat Pump Deployment Program and to ensure the  program complements any exist-
ing programs or services.
(f) Electric utilities and utility program administrators on  any impacts the Heat Pump
Deployment Program may have on utility systems  or services and to ensure the program
complements any existing programs, incentives or services.
(g) Nonprofit organizations,  housing providers, heat pump technicians and other
stakeholders as appropriate.
SECTION 15.
(1) The Heat Pump Deployment Advisory Council is established.
(2) The council consists of representatives from eligible entities administering grant
funds under the Heat Pump Deployment Program established under section  14 of this 2022
Act.
(3) The council shall study and identify:
(a) Best practices for administering grant funds and providing financial assistance;
(b) Barriers to administering grant funds and providing financial assistance; and
(c) Opportunities for providing technical assistance.
(4) A majority of the members of the council constitutes a quorum for  the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the council requires the approval  of a majority of the members of
the council.
(6) The council shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) The council shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson  or
of a majority of the members of the council. The council may meet  by telephone or video
conference.
(8) The council may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the council.
(9) Members of the council are entitled to compensation  and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495 from moneys in the Heat Pump Deployment Fund established under section 16 of  this
2022 Act.
(10) The State Department of Energy shall provide staff support to the council.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 13
SECTION 16. (1) The Heat  Pump Deployment Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Heat Pump Deployment
Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative Assem-
bly;
(b) Moneys received from federal, state or local sources;
(c) Gifts, grants or other moneys contributed to the fund; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(2) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the State Department of Energy
for the purpose of the Heat Pump  Deployment Program established under section 14 of this
2022 Act.
(3) The department may use reasonable amounts from the fund,  but no more than 15
percent of the fund, necessary to:
(a) Administer and market the Heat Pump Deployment Program; and
(b) Provide for the compensation and expenses of members of the Heat Pump Deployment
Advisory Council established under section 15 of this 2022 Act.
(4) The Director of the State Department  of Energy shall submit a biennial report to the
Legislative Assembly in the manner provided by ORS 293.640 regarding the expenditures of
moneys deposited in the Heat Pump Deployment Fund, including:
(a) A detailed description of the use of the moneys;
(b) A detailed description of the loans, grants or other financial assistance provided from
the moneys and, where applicable, an accounting of the repayment status of the loans;
(c) The nature and amounts of  the administrative expenses and marketing costs paid
from the moneys; and
(d) Indicators of program success.
SECTION 17.
The Director of the State Department of Energy shall submit  the first
biennial report  required under section 16 of this 2022 Act to the Legislative Assembly no
later than December 31, 2023.
SECTION 18. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000  for deposit into the Heat Pump Deployment Fund
established under section 16 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 18a. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,548,537 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the State Department of Energy from the Heat Pump Deployment
Fund established under section 16 of this 2022 Act to be used for the Heat Pump Deployment
Program under sections 14 to 17 of this 2022 Act.
RESIDENTIAL HEAT PUMP REBATES AND GRANTS
SECTION 19.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall provide rebates for  the purchase
and installation of air-source or ground-source heat pumps to owners of a dwelling unit used
as a residential tenancy and to owners of a manufactured dwelling or recreational  vehicle
who rent a space in a manufactured dwelling or recreational vehicle park.
(2)(a) Rebates available under this section may only be claimed by a contractor that in-
stalls a heat  pump for the owner of a residential dwelling unit in Oregon. A contractor that
claims a rebate under this section must use the full amount of the rebate to reduce the net
cost to the customer of the purchase of the heat pump for which the rebate is issued.
(b) The amount that may be claimed as a rebate under this section may not exceed:
(A) For the owner of a dwelling unit used as a residential tenancy, 60 percent of the
purchase price of the heat pump.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 14
(B) For the owner  of a manufactured dwelling or recreation vehicle, a percentage of the
purchase price of the heat pump as established by the department.
(c) To be eligible to claim a rebate on behalf of a customer under this section, a  con-
tractor that installs a heat pump must, at the time of the installation:
(A) Hold any license, bond, insurance or permit required  to sell and install the heat
pump;
(B) Demonstrate a history of  compliance with the rules and other requirements of the
Construction Contractors Board, the Bureau of Labor and Industries and  the Workers’
Compensation Division and the Occupational Safety and Health Division of  the Department
of Consumer and Business Services; and
(C) Meet any other certification requirements set forth in rules adopted by  the State
Department of Energy.
(3) To claim a rebate under this section, a contractor must:
(a) Before installing  a heat pump, apply to the department to reserve a rebate on behalf
of the customer for whom the heat pump will be installed.
(b) After installing the heat pump, verify the purchase and  installation of the heat pump
on a form provided by the department that must contain:
(A) The location of the heat pump;
(B) A description of the heat pump;
(C) Evidence that  the contractor is eligible to claim a rebate under subsection (2)(c) of
this section;
(D) A statement signed by both the contractor and the  customer for whom the heat
pump is installed that the customer has received the  full value of the rebate as a reduction
in the net  cost of the purchase and installation of the heat pump and that the rebate was
clearly reflected on an invoice provided to the customer;
(E) The projected energy savings from the installation of the heat pump; and
(F) Any other information that the department determines is necessary.
(4) Rebates made under this section must be made from  moneys in the Residential Heat
Pump Fund established under section 21 of this 2022 Act. A rebate may  be made only if there
are moneys available in the fund to make the rebate.
(5) Pursuant to the procedures for a contested case under ORS  chapter 183, the depart-
ment may:
(a) Deny or revoke a  contractor’s eligibility to claim a rebate on behalf of a customer
under this section if the department finds that:
(A) The contractor’s eligibility was obtained  by fraud or misrepresentation by the con-
tractor;
(B) The contractor’s performance for installation  of heat pumps does not meet industry
standards; or
(C) The contractor has misrepresented to customers  either the program established un-
der this section or the nature or quality of the heat pumps for which rebates are available.
(b) Revoke a rebate or a portion of a rebate made  under this section if the department
finds that:
(A) The rebate was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation; or
(B) The rebate was obtained by mistake or miscalculation.
(6)(a) The department may adopt rules to administer the rebate program.
(b) In adopting rules under this section, the department  may coordinate or consult with:
(A) The Housing and Community  Services Department, the Building Codes Division of the
Department of Consumer and Business Services and any other relevant state agencies;
(B) Nonprofit organizations and utilities; and
(C) Other incentive providers.
(c) Rules adopted under this section may include:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 15
(A) Preferences  for providing rebates that benefit low and moderate income residential
tenants;
(B) Preferences for providing rebates  to support heat pumps with superior energy effi-
ciency;
(C) Provisions for determining eligibility and verification of heat pumps; and
(D) Policies and procedures for the administration and enforcement of this section and
section 21 of this 2022 Act,  which may include policies and procedures for audits and in-
spections.
SECTION 20.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall provide grants for upgrades, in-
cluding electrical and mechanical upgrades, to facilitate the installation  of heat pumps for
owners of  a dwelling unit or a manufactured dwelling for whom a rebate has been reserved
under section 19 (3)(a) of this 2022 Act.
(2) Grants made under this section must  be made from moneys in the Residential Heat
Pump Fund established under section 21 of this 2022 Act.  A grant may be made only if there
are moneys available in the fund to make the grant.
(3)(a) The department shall adopt rules to administer the grant program.
(b) In adopting rules under this section, the department  may coordinate or consult with:
(A) The Housing and Community  Services Department, the Building Codes Division of the
Department of Consumer and Business Services, the United States  Department of Energy
and any other relevant agencies;
(B) Nonprofit organizations and utilities; and
(C) Other incentive providers.
(c) Rules adopted under this section must include:
(A) Preferences for providing grants  that benefit low and moderate income residential
tenants;
(B) Provisions for determining eligibility and verification of the upgrades; and
(C) Policies and procedures for the administration and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 21.
(1) The Residential  Heat Pump Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Moneys in the Residential Heat Pump Fund
consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative  As-
sembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited into the fund from any public or private source.
(2) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the State Department of Energy
to be used to provide grants and rebates under sections 19 and 20 of this 2022 Act and to pay
the costs and expenses of the department  related to the administration and implementation
of sections 19 and 20 of this 2022 Act.
(3) In each  calendar year, of the moneys available for issuing grants and rebate from the
fund:
(a) 25 percent must be reserved for affordable housing providers; and
(b) 25 percent  must be reserved for loans for owners of units occupied by households
whose income is less than 80 percent of the area median income.
SECTION 22.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000 for deposit into  the Residential Heat Pump Fund
established under section 21 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 22a. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$6,562,051 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the State Department of Energy from the Residential Heat Pump
Fund established under section 21 of this 2022 Act to be used for the residential heat pump
rebate and grant programs under sections 19 to 21 of this 2022 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 16
SECTION 23. (1) Sections 19 to 21 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2025.
(2) On  the date of the repeal of sections 19 to 21 of this 2022 Act under subsection (1) of
this section, any moneys  in the Residential Heat Pump Fund that are unexpended, unobli-
gated and not subject to any conditions or reservations under section 19 (3)(a) of this  2022
Act are transferred to the General Fund.
COMMUNITY COOLING SPACES
SECTION 24. (1) The State Department of Energy shall provide a grant to the  nongov-
ernmental entity that administers public purpose charge moneys under  ORS 757.612 (3)(d) to
enable the nongovernmental entity to assist  landlords in creating or operating, whenever
there is an extreme heat event as defined in section 2 of this 2022 Act for the county of  the
premises, one or more private community cooling spaces available to  the landlord’s tenants
during the extreme  heat event that are on or near the premises and that maintain a tem-
perature of not higher than 80 degrees Fahrenheit.
(2) Assistance provided under this section may include:
(a) Grants to landlords to  create or operate community cooling spaces that will accom-
modate at least five individuals.
(b) Information to landlords regarding:
(A) Lists of providers and installers of suitable cooling devices;
(B) Private and government programs that may be used  to create or operate community
cooling spaces; and
(C) Best practices and model technical specifications for installing and  operating various
temporary and permanent community cooling spaces.
(c) Promoting the services relating to community cooling spaces  under this section that
are provided by the nongovernmental entity.
(3) The nongovernmental entity receiving a grant under this section shall  maintain sep-
arate accounting of the expenditures of  the grant funds and shall report the accounting to
the Public Utility Commission and the independent  auditor described in ORS 757.746 (1)(d).
The nongovernmental entity may not utilize moneys received under ORS 757.054 (4) or 757.612
(3)(d) for grant purposes under this section.
SECTION 25.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to provide grants under section 24 of this 2022 Act.
COOLING NEEDS STUDY
SECTION 26. (1) The State Department  of Energy shall study the cooling and electrical
needs of publicly supported housing as defined in ORS 456.250, manufactured dwelling parks
and recreational vehicle parks. The study  should detail information including but not limited
to the following:
(a) The prevalence of cooling facilities;
(b) The need for cooling facilities;
(c) Barriers to transitioning housing and parks to include cooling facilities; and
(d) When possible, specific scenarios for  properties in development or preservation to add
cooling facilities.
(2) The Building Codes Division of the Department  of Consumer and Business Services
shall provide assistance in conducting the study under this section.
SECTION 27.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $500,000, to perform the  duties of the department under section
26 of this 2022 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 17
SECTION 28. Section 26 of this 2022 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
STATE DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY REPORTS
SECTION 29. No later than  September 15, 2023, the State Department of Energy shall
provide a report to an  appropriate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245 on:
(1) The heat pump grants and rebates under sections 19 and 20 of this 2022 Act;
(2) The community cooling spaces under section 24 of this 2022 Act; and
(3) The results of the cooling needs study under section 26 of this 2022 Act.
WARMING AND COOLING SHELTERS
SECTION 30.
 ORS 431A.410 is amended to read:
431A.410. (1) As used in this section, “smoke filtration system” means an  air filtration system
capable of removing particulates and other harmful components of wildfire smoke in a public  build-
ing.
(2) In consultation and coordination with the Oregon Health Authority, the Department  of Hu-
man Services shall establish and implement a grant program that allows local governments to:
(a) Establish emergency [ clean air ] shelters  for clean air, warming or cooling .
(b) Equip public buildings with :
(A) Smoke filtration systems  so the public buildings may serve as cleaner air spaces during
wildfire smoke and other poor air quality events.
(B) Warming or cooling facilities so the public buildings may serve as temperate  spaces
during dangerously hot or cold conditions.
(3) The department shall require grantees to  provide access to the [ clean air ] shelters at no
charge.
(4) Warming or cooling shelters or facilities receiving grants  under this section shall
notify the 2-1-1 system provided  for in ORS 403.400 to 403.430, regarding the shelter’s location
and capacity and shall keep the  corporation updated with the shelter’s hours and dates of
operation.
SECTION 30a. If Senate Bill  1533 becomes law, section 1, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2022
(Enrolled Senate Bill 1533) (amending ORS 431A.410), is repealed  and ORS 431A.410, as
amended by section 30 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
431A.410. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Public education provider” has the meaning given that term in ORS 326.545.
(b) “Smoke filtration system” means an  air filtration system capable of removing particulates
and other harmful components of wildfire smoke in a public building.
(2) In consultation  and coordination with the Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Hu-
man Services shall establish and implement a grant  program that allows local governments , public
education providers and federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon  to:
(a) Establish  emergency [ shelters for clean ] spaces that provide cleaner  air, warming or cool-
ing.
(b) Equip public buildings with:
(A) Smoke filtration  systems so the public buildings may serve as cleaner air spaces during
wildfire smoke and other poor air quality events.
(B) Warming or cooling facilities so the public  buildings may serve as temperate spaces during
dangerously hot or cold conditions.
(3) The  department shall require grantees to provide access to the [ shelters] spaces  at no
charge.
(4) Warming or cooling [ shelters] spaces  or facilities receiving grants under this section shall
notify the 2-1-1 system provided  for in ORS 403.400 to 403.430, regarding the [ shelter’s] space’s  lo-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 18
cation and capacity and shall  keep the corporation updated with the [ shelter’s] space’s  hours and
dates of operation.
SECTION 31.  ORS 431A.412 is amended to read:
431A.412. The Department  of Human Services is the lead state agency for clean air , warming
and cooling shelter operations. The department shall:
(1) Consult and collaborate with the Oregon Health Authority  to align practices for voluntary
evacuations and emergency sheltering operations.
(2) Coordinate with the authority in setting priorities for awarding grants described in ORS
431A.410.
(3) Provide support to local agencies that take lead roles in operating and planning [ clean air ]
shelters in the local agencies’ jurisdictions.
SECTION 31a. If Senate Bill 1533 becomes law, section 1a, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2022
(Enrolled Senate Bill 1533) (amending  ORS 431A.412), is repealed and ORS 431A.412, as
amended by section 31 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
431A.412. (1) As used in this section, “public  education provider” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 326.545.
(2) The Department of Human Services is the lead state  agency for [ clean air, warming and
cooling shelter operations ] operating spaces that provide cleaner air, warming or  cooling . The
department shall:
[(1)] (a) Consult and  collaborate with the Oregon Health Authority to align practices for vol-
untary evacuations and emergency sheltering operations.
[(2)] (b) Coordinate with the authority  in setting priorities for awarding grants described in ORS
431A.410.
[(3)] (c) Provide support to  the  local  agencies , public education providers and federally re-
cognized Indian tribes in Oregon  that take lead roles in operating and planning [ shelters in the
local agencies’ jurisdictions ] spaces that provide cleaner air, warming or cooling .
SECTION 32. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to provide  grants for emergency shelters or
facilities that include warming or cooling under ORS 431A.410 (2)(a) or (b)(B).
SECTION 32a.
 If Senate Bill 1533  becomes law, section 32 of this 2022 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 32.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropriated to the
Department of Human Services, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the
amount of $2,000,000, to  provide grants for emergency [ shelters] spaces or facilities that include
warming or cooling under ORS 431A.410 (2)(a) or (b)(B).
HEALTHY HOMES PROGRAM
SECTION 33.  ORS 431A.400 is amended to read:
431A.400. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible entity” means a:
(A) Local government as defined in ORS 174.116;
(B) Local housing authority;
(C) Nonprofit organization;
(D) Federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon;
(E) Indian health center;
[(E)] (F)  Coordinated care organization as defined in ORS 414.025;
[(F)] (G)  Community action agency as described in ORS 458.505; [ or]
[(G) Program administered by: ]
(H) Manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative as defined in ORS 62.803;
[(i)] (I) An electric [ company] utility as defined in ORS 757.600; or
[(ii)] (J) A natural gas utility as defined in ORS 757.392.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 19
(b) “Environmental justice factor” means a  circumstance or condition that impacts a
community’s ability to achieve a  balance of health, economic or environmental benefits and burdens
or that impacts a community’s ability to participate in public processes.
(c) “Grant  program recipient” means an eligible entity that has been awarded a grant from the
Oregon Health Authority under this section.
(d) “Landlord” means a landlord, as defined in ORS 90.100, that meets eligibility  criteria for a
loan, grant or  other financial assistance under the Healthy Homes Program as determined by the
authority.
(e) “Low income household” means a household having an income equal to or below  80 percent
of the area median family income as determined by the authority.
(f) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or  group of organizations that is described
in section 501(c)(3) of  the Internal Revenue Code and is exempt from income tax under section 501(a)
of the Internal Revenue Code.
(g) “Repair and rehabilitation” includes actions that:
(A) Maximize energy efficiency of residences;
(B) Extend the usable life of residences; or
(C) Improve the health and safety of the occupants of residences, including:
(i) Radon abatement;
(ii) Lead abatement;
(iii) Mold and mildew abatement;
(iv) Installation of a smoke filtration system, an air purification system or  ventilation or re-
duction of pathways for air infiltration;
(v) Removal of asthma or allergen triggers;
(vi) Structural or safety improvements that increase accessibility or visitability;
(vii) Improvements that make homes more fire resistant; [ and]
(viii) Structural or safety improvements that promote seismic resiliency[ .];
(ix) Improvements that reduce the reflection of heat on or around the home,  including
improvements related to trees, vegetation, green roofs or cool roofs; and
(x) Electrical upgrades that improve the safety  of the home or support or enable the use
of energy efficiency upgrades such as heating or cooling devices.
(h) “Residence” means a  dwelling that is intended for occupation by a single family and is oc-
cupied by one or  more individuals who are members of a low income household as the individuals’
principal residence, including a site-built home, manufactured  home, residential trailer, mobile home,
condominium unit or unit within multifamily housing.
(i) “Smoke filtration system” means a residential air filtration system  that meets minimum effi-
ciency standards, as determined by the authority, for the removal of particulates  and other harmful
substances generated by wildfires.
(2) The Healthy Homes Program  is established within the Oregon Health Authority. The purpose
of the  program is to provide grants to eligible entities that provide financial assistance to persons
in low  income households to repair and rehabilitate their residences and to landlords to repair and
rehabilitate dwelling units inhabited by low income households.
(3) To be eligible to receive grants from the Healthy Homes Program,  an eligible entity must
establish that it:
(a) Serves or represents:
(A) Communities with high concentrations of low income households; or
(B) Communities impacted by environmental justice factors, including but not limited to:
(i) Areas with above-average concentrations of historically disadvantaged households or  resi-
dents with low levels of educational attainment, areas  with high unemployment, high linguistic iso-
lation, low levels of homeownership or high rent burden or sensitive populations;
(ii) Areas  disproportionately affected by environmental pollution and other hazards that can lead
to negative public health effects, exposure or environmental degradation; or
(iii) Other environmental justice factors as determined by the authority.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 20
(b) Has the capacity to administer grant funds received under this section.
(c) Is able to comply with the requirements of all state and federal laws, rules and regulations.
(4)(a) The authority shall adopt by rule processes for eligible  entities to apply to receive grants
from the Healthy Homes Program. The processes may include a request for proposals.
(b) The authority may adopt by rule:
(A) Standards for repair and rehabilitation activities conducted by low-income households;
(B) Standards for repair and rehabilitation activities conducted by landlords;
(C) Additional requirements for landlords who receive program funds; and
(D) Provisions for  the allocation of program funds including but not limited to allocations for
types of eligible entities, types of recipients, types of housing and regions of this state.
(c) The authority, in  consultation with the Governor’s Policy Advisor for Economic and Business
Equity, may establish by rule standards for  the work performed using grants from the program to
be performed by disadvantaged  business enterprises, minority-owned businesses, woman-owned busi-
nesses or businesses that service-disabled veterans own, as those terms are defined in ORS 200.005.
(5) Upon being awarded a grant under this  section, the grant program recipient shall enter into
an agreement with the authority that contains provisions that:
(a) Indicate the purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(b) Prohibit the grant program recipient from using more than  15 percent of grant funds for
administrative expenses and program delivery costs;
(c) Include the repayment provisions set forth in subsection (6) of this section;
(d) Permit the authority to conduct audits and investigations of the  grant program recipient
regarding the purposes for which grant funds have been used; and
(e) Require the grant program recipient to provide reports as set  forth in subsection (7) of this
section.
(6) A grant program recipient must repay to the authority,  in whole or in part, grant funds re-
ceived under this section to the extent that:
(a) The grant program recipient does not use the grant  funds in accordance with the provisions
of the grant agreement executed between the authority and the grant program recipient under  sub-
section (5) of this section; or
(b) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority determines that the grant program  recipient
must repay all or part of the grant funds on grounds of misappropriation, fraud or similar  reasons
after auditing or  investigating the grant program recipient’s operations and conducting a contested
case hearing under ORS 183.413 to 183.470.
(7) A grant program recipient shall report to the authority by June 30 of each year  concerning
the status and use of grant funds received under this section. The  report required under this section
may not disclose the personal information  of the recipients of loans, grants or other financial as-
sistance under the Healthy Homes Program. The report must include:
(a) A detailed description of the grant program recipient’s use of grant funds;
(b) A list of each loan, grant or other financial assistance that the grant program  recipient has
provided and, where applicable, a full accounting of the repayment status of the loans;
(c) The number of  low income households that the grant program recipient has provided finan-
cial assistance to for the repair and rehabilitation of their residences;
(d) The number of landlords that the grant program  recipient has provided financial assistance
to for the repair and rehabilitation of dwelling units;
(e) The nature and amounts of the administrative expenses and  program delivery costs the grant
program recipient has incurred in providing the financial assistance under the program;
(f) Disaggregated data concerning the income, racial or ethnic  background, family size and re-
lated demographic information of low income households who received financial assistance for repair
and rehabilitation of residences under the program from the grant program recipient; and
(g) Any other information required by the authority.
(8) The authority may not pay amounts for grants under this section  from any source other than
available funds in the Healthy Homes Repair Fund established in ORS 431A.402.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 21
(9) Under the Healthy Homes Program, the authority may  develop, or contract with public in-
stitutions of higher education or nonprofit organizations to assist in developing:
(a) Methods for evaluating health hazards in housing;
(b) Methods for preventing and reducing health hazards in housing;
(c) Performance measures for the work being performed through the financial assistance pro-
vided under the program; and
(d) Recommendations for promoting the incorporation of healthy housing into  ongoing practices
and systems, including housing codes.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 34.
The unit captions  used in this 2022 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 35. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 2, 2022
Repassed by Senate March 4, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1536 (SB 1536-C) Page 22